District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.32

DC Circulator.

The Department shall have the power to:

(1)

Plan, develop, finance, operate, control, and regulate the DC Circulator, including fares, charges, tickets, fines, and the establishment of routes and schedules;

(2)

Sell space on and within DC Circulator vehicles or other assets for the display of advertisements and enter into one or more agreements with entities to sell such space on such vehicles or other assets in return for a fee, a percentage of such revenues, or as a gift or donation of services approved by the Mayor; and

(3)

Enter into contracts with third parties, including WMATA for the procurement, construction, operation, and maintenance of DC Circulator vehicles or other assets.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11b
as added Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-225, § 3(e), 53 DCR 10232
This section is referenced in § 50-921.33.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(d) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-134, June 16, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 5762).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(d) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-321, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2557).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(e) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-3, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1439).